Tennessee statutes. Title 9 Public Finances
Part 3

Tax Revenue Anticipation Notes

9-9-301. Issuance and sale — Interest — Guidelines.

Pending the receipt of tax revenues during any fiscal year, the state of Tennessee, acting by resolutions of its funding board, is hereby authorized and empowered to issue and sell, either at public or private sale, at not less than par and accrued interest, its interest-bearing revenue anticipation note or notes. Such note or notes shall be authorized by resolution of the funding board, shall bear such date or dates, and shall mature at such time or times, including any renewals thereof, as such resolution or resolutions may provide, but shall mature within the fiscal year of their issuance. Such notes shall bear interest at such rate or rates, be in such denominations, be in such form, carry such registration privileges, be executed in such manner, be payable in such medium of payment, at such place or places and be subject to such terms of redemption and contain such other terms and provisions, and the state may otherwise provide with respect to the authorization, sale and issuance of such notes, as such resolution or resolutions may provide.

Any resolution or resolutions of the state funding board authorizing the issuance of such tax revenue anticipation note or notes shall provide that the same are issued in anticipation of the tax revenue within the then current fiscal year and shall further provide that the full faith and credit of the state of Tennessee are pledged to the payment of such note or notes. The state funding board shall provide for the payment of the principal of and interest on all notes issued under this section as the same shall become due, out of revenues and funds available for such purposes.

The state funding board is hereby authorized to procure such legal and technical advice, approving opinions and such financial assistance as it may consider necessary in connection with the carrying into effect of this section, and is also authorized to pay all necessary expenses and incidental expenses. All such expenses may be funded by notes issued under this section.

Acts 2002, ch. 552, § 2; Acts 2013, ch. 176, § 10; T.C.A. §9-10-101(a)-(c).

Compiler's Notes. Former §9-10-101 (a)–(c) (Acts 2002, ch. 552, § 2), concerning issuance and sale, interest and guidelines, was transferred to §9-9-301 by Acts 2013, ch. 175, § 10, effective July 1, 2013.

Acts 2013, ch. 176, § 1 provided that the act, which transferred former §9-10-101(a)-(c) to this section, shall be known and may be cited as the “Hawkins-Wilson Act.”

Acts 2013, ch. 176, § 11 provided that nothing in the act, which transferred former §9-10-101(a)-(c) to this section, shall be construed so as to impair the obligation of any contract made by the state of Tennessee upon any bond of the state issued under title 9, chapter 9 outstanding as of July 1, 2013.